Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB584.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. George W. McAuley, Jr. Memorial Bridge.(a) Findings.--The General Assembly finds and declares as follows:(1) George W. McAuley, Jr., was born December 19, 1962, to George W. McAuley, Sr., and Lulu (née Hartman) McAuley.(2) Mr. McAuley graduated from Kittanning High School and Lenape Technical School in 1980, before earning a degree in civil engineering from The Pennsylvania State University in 1984.(3) For 33 years, Mr. McAuley had a distinguished career with the Department of Transportation. During that time, he served as a professional engineer and as an Assistant District Executive overseeing various operations in the 12345678910111213141516171819 department's District 10. Additionally, he briefly served as the acting Director of the Department of Transportation's Bureau of Project Delivery.(4) In December 2016, Mr. McAuley became the department's Deputy Secretary for Highway Administration and was appointed the Executive Deputy Secretary of Transportation on January 7, 2020.(5) Mr. McAuley played an instrumental role in the advancement of Pennsylvania's Rapid Bridge Replacement Public Private Partnership contract to deliver 558 bridges Statewide, the first of its scope in the United States.(6) In addition to his work at the Department of Transportation, Mr. McAuley was an active member of the American Association of State Highway and Transportation Officials and served as chair of its Innovation Initiative as well as chair of the National Cooperative Highway Research Program.(7) On February 28, 2021, George McAuley passed away at 58 years of age, leaving behind his loving wife of 35 years, Stephanie (née Willyard) McAuley, and their daughter Megan.(8) To commemorate Mr. McAuley's exceptional service and leadership, the Department of Transportation established The George W. McAuley, Jr., P.E. Award for Innovation. The award recognizes employee-driven teams of three or more that help to promote and foster continuous improvement at the Department of Transportation by advancing an innovation or solving a problem.(9) Mr. McAuley's distinguished service at the Department of Transportation has improved highway safety in this Commonwealth and is deserving of recognition.20250SB0584PN0591 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (b) Designation.--The bridge, identified as Bridge Key 56035, carrying U.S. Route 422 over State Route 2005 and Cherry Run in Plumcreek Township, Armstrong County, is designated the George W. McAuley, Jr. Memorial Bridge.(c) Signs.--The Department of Transportation shall erect and maintain appropriate signs displaying the name of the bridge to traffic in both directions on the bridge.Section 2. Effective date.This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0584PN0591 - 3 - 123456789